Idaho, session 2025, H0114.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-714, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-714. FILLING VACANCIES IN SLATE OF POLITICAL PARTY CANDIDATES
OCCURRING PRIOR TO PRIMARY ELECTION.
(1)(a) Vacancies that occur before the primary an election in the slate
of candidates of any political party because of the death, or disqual-
ification for any reason, or withdrawal from the nomination process by
the candidate, shall be filled in the following manner if there is only
one (1) candidate declared from that political party for that particu-
lar office:
(a) (i) By the county central committee if the vacancy occurs for
the office of precinct committeeman or for a county office.
(b) (ii) By the legislative district central committee if the va-
cancy occurs for the office of state representative or state sena-
tor.
(c) (iii) By the state central committee if the vacancy occurs for
a federal or state office.
(b) The county and legislative district proper central committee shall
fill the vacancy within fifteen (15) days from the date the vacancy oc-
curred or no later than five (5) days prior to the date by which absentee
ballots must be mailed to voters requesting such ballots for the next
election for the particular office, whichever occurs first. The state
central committee shall fill the vacancy within thirty (30) days from
the date the vacancy occurred.
(c) Any political party candidate so appointed by the proper central
committee must, in order to have his name on the primary or general elec-
tion ballot, file a declaration of candidacy and pay the required fil-
ing fee by no later than the day prior to when absentee ballots must be
mailed to voters requesting such ballots for the next election for the
particular office.


(2) No central committee shall fill any vacancy which occurs within ten
(10) days prior to the primary election. Vacancies which occur during this
ten (10) day period because of the death, disqualification for any reason,
or withdrawal from the nomination process by the candidate shall be filled
according to the provisions of section 34-715, Idaho Code.
(2) The name of the candidate for any vacancy filled pursuant to sub-
section (1) of this section both fewer than fifty (50) days before a primary
election and at least fifty (50) days prior to a general election shall ap-
pear on the general election ballot, but not the primary election ballot,
which shall retain the original candidate's name, but for which a tally of
primary election votes need not be made.
(3) Vacancies that occur in a slate of candidates for precinct commit-
teeman within ten (10) fewer than fifty (50) days prior to the primary elec-
tion shall not be filled.
(4) Any vacancies in a slate of candidates for any partisan office ex-
cept precinct committeeman that are not filled by fifty (50) days prior to
a general election shall not be filled, and the name of the dead or disqual-
ified candidate shall remain on the ballot. If the general election is won
by the dead or disqualified candidate, the resulting vacancy shall be filled
pursuant to chapter 9, title 59, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-715, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 34-717, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-717. WITHDRAWAL OF CANDIDACY. (1) A Except as provided in subsec-
tion (3) of this section, a candidate for nomination or candidate for elec-
tion to a partisan office may withdraw from the primary election by filing a
notarized statement of withdrawal with the officer with whom his declaration
of candidacy was filed. The statement must contain all information neces-
sary to identify the candidate and the office sought and the reason for with-
drawal. The filing officer shall immediately notify the proper central com-
mittee of the party, if any, of the individual withdrawing. A candidate may
not withdraw later than forty-five (45) fifty (50) days before an election,
except in the case of a primary election, when the deadline shall be no later
than the eighth Friday preceding the primary election, or a general elec-
tion, when the deadline shall be no later than September 7; provided however,
that a candidate for partisan office may not withdraw after the filing dead-
line for candidates whose names will appear on the primary election ballot
if the candidate is that political party's only candidate for the office for
which the candidate is filed. Filing fees paid by the candidate shall not be
refunded.
(2) Any candidate who has filed a statement of withdrawal pursuant to
this section shall not be allowed to be appointed to fill a vacancy unless
such vacancy occurs because of the death of a previous candidate.
(3) Independent candidates may withdraw from the general election by
filing a notarized statement of withdrawal with the secretary of state by no
later than September 7. The statement must contain all information neces-


sary to identify the candidate, the office sought, and the reason for with-
drawal. Filing fees paid by the candidate shall not be refunded.
SECTION 4. That Section 34-909, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-909. GENERAL ELECTION SAMPLE BALLOTS FORWARDED TO COUNTIES BY SEC-
RETARY OF STATE. (1) The secretary of state, no later than September 7, shall
provide the necessary general election sample ballot layout to each of the
county clerks.
(2) The sample ballot layout shall contain the proper office titles,
order of offices and ballot layout for the general election, with instruc-
tions for placement of candidates seeking election for federal, state,
legislative, county and precinct offices and candidates seeking judicial
office or retention. If a county is within more than one (1) legislative
district, the secretary of state shall provide instructions on the require-
ments for a separate ballot for each legislative district that is within the
county.
(3) The secretary of state shall certify to the county clerks the names
and political party of the candidates qualified for placement on the general
election ballot for all federal, state and legislative district offices on
the sample ballots, along with any judicial candidates, by no later than the
ninth Friday prior to the general election.
(4) The secretary of state shall certify the name of a candidate be-
ing appointed by the appropriate central committee as provided by section
34-715 34-714, Idaho Code, by no later than the next business day after the
appointment is received in the secretary of state's office, if received af-
ter the certification of candidates to the county clerks under subsection
(3) of this section.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.